Missouri, session 2026, SB990.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 302.020 and 302.026, RSMo, are
repealed and one new section enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as section 302.020, to read as follows:
302.020. 1. Unless otherwise provided for by law, it
shall be unlawful for any person, except those expressly
exempted by section 302.080, to:
(1) Operate any vehicle upon any highway in this state
unless the person has a valid license;
(2) Operate a motorcycle or motortricycle upon any
highway of this state unless such person has a valid license
that shows the person has successfully passed an examination
for the operation of a motorcycle or motortricycle as
prescribed by the director. The director may indicate such
upon a valid license issued to such person, or shall issue a
license restricting the applicant to the operation of a
motorcycle or motortricycle if the actual demonstration,
required by section 302.173, is conducted on such vehicle;
(3) Authorize or knowingly permit a motorcycle or
motortricycle owned by such person or under such person's
control to be driven upon any highway by any person whose
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 990 2
license does not indicate that the person has passed the
examination for the operation of a motorcycle or
motortricycle or has been issued an instruction permit
therefor;
(4) Operate a motor vehicle with an instruction permit
or license issued to another person.
2. Every person [under twenty-six years of age] who is
operating or riding as a passenger on any motorcycle or
motortricycle, as defined in section 301.010, upon any
highway of this state shall wear protective headgear at all
times the vehicle is in motion[; except that, any person
twenty-six years of age or older operating any motorcycle or
motortricycle who has been issued an instruction permit
shall wear protective headgear at all times the vehicle is
in motion]. The protective headgear shall meet reasonable
standards and specifications established by the director.
[No political subdivision of this state shall impose a
protective headgear requirement on the operator or passenger
of a motorcycle or motortricycle. No person shall be
stopped, inspected, or detained solely to determine
compliance with this subsection.]
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 302.340
any person convicted of violating subdivision (1) or (2) of
subsection 1 of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. A
first violation of subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of
this section shall be punishable as a class D misdemeanor.
A second violation of subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1
of this section shall be punishable as a class A
misdemeanor. Any person convicted a third or subsequent
time of violating subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of
this section is guilty of a class E felony. Notwithstanding
the provisions of section 302.340, violation of subdivisions

SB 990 3
(3) and (4) of subsection 1 of this section is a
misdemeanor, the first violation punishable as a class D
misdemeanor, a second or subsequent violation of this
section punishable as a class C misdemeanor, and the penalty
for failure to wear protective headgear as required by
subsection 2 of this section is an infraction for which a
fine not to exceed twenty-five dollars may be imposed.
Notwithstanding all other provisions of law and court rules
to the contrary, no court costs shall be imposed upon any
person due to such violation. No points shall be assessed
pursuant to section 302.302 for a failure to wear such
protective headgear. Prior pleas of guilty and prior
findings of guilty shall be pleaded and proven in the same
manner as required by section 558.021.
[302.026. 1. Any qualified motorcycle
operator who is twenty-six years of age or older
may operate a motorcycle or motortricycle upon
any highway of this state without wearing
protective headgear if he or she in addition to
maintaining proof of financial responsibility in
accordance with chapter 303, is covered by a
health insurance policy or other form of
insurance which will provide the person with
medical benefits for injuries incurred as a
result of an accident while operating or riding
on a motorcycle or motortricycle.
2. Proof of coverage required by
subsection 1 of this section shall be provided,
upon request by authorized law enforcement, by
showing a copy of the qualified operator's
insurance card.
3. No person shall be stopped, inspected,
or detained solely to determine compliance with
this section.]
✓